Massachusetts, session 194th, S337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 14B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word “expense”, in line 32, the following words:- provided that all such 
expenses shall be allocated evenly, relative to the number of attending students, among the towns 
in such a district.